Maine, session 132, LD855.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 21-A MRSA §1125, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2023, c. 211, §1, is further
amended to read:
1. Declaration of intent. A participating candidate shall file a declaration of intent to
seek certification as a Maine Clean Election Act candidate and to comply with the
requirements of this chapter. The declaration of intent must be filed with the commission
prior to or during the qualifying period, except as provided in subsection 11 or 11‑A,
according to forms and procedures developed by the commission. Qualifying contributions
collected more than 5 business days before the declaration of intent has been filed will not
be counted toward the eligibility requirements in subsection 3 or 3‑A. A candidate may
participate only once as a certified candidate for either House of the Legislature within a
15-year period.
Sec. 2. 21-A MRSA §1125, sub-§5, ¶D-5, as enacted by PL 2011, c. 389, §52, is
amended to read:
D-5. Not submitted any fraudulent qualifying contributions or any falsified
acknowledgement forms for qualifying contributions or seed money contributions; and
Sec. 3. 21-A MRSA §1125, sub-§5, ¶D-6 is enacted to read:
D-6. Not participated as a certified candidate for office in the same House of the
Legislature within 15 years; and